Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-60.7 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Req. No. 12715 Page 1

A. The State Department of Agriculture shall operate an "Ag in
the Classroom Program" for the purpose of educating students about
agriculture within Oklahoma.
B. The Department shall:
1. Develop curriculum for pre-kindergarten through twelfth
grade Ag in the Classroom programs for urban and rural schools;
2. Provide training and workshops for Oklahoma teachers who
utilize Ag in the Classroom curriculum;
3. Utilize existing Department resources and related programs
to develop and enhance the Ag in the Classroom Program; and
4. Cooperate with the State Department of Education and the
Oklahoma State University Cooperative Extension Service as needed in
development and operation of the Ag in the Classroom Program.
C. The State Department of Agriculture shall have exclusive
control and authority over the Ag in the Classroom Program and no
other state agency, board, commission, department, or other entity
of state government shall have authority with respect to the
Program. The Department shall directly receive all funds obtained
for the Ag in the Classroom Program pursuant to Section 1104.3 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The Department may apply for,
accept, and use any gift, grant, or bequest from any source for the
purpose of discharging its duties under this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Req. No. 12715 Page 2

Section 1104.3. A. Twenty-four Dollars ($24.00) Twenty-seven
Dollars ($27.00) of the fee authorized by Section 1135.5 of this
title for Agricultural Awareness license plates shall be deposited
to the Ag in the Classroom Education Revolving Fund created in
subsection B of this section.
B. 1. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the State Department of Agriculture to be
designated the "Ag in the Classroom Education Revolving Fund". The
fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Department pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this
section, appropriated or apportioned by the Legislature and received
as federal grants or funds, municipal contributions, private
contributors, and received from other sources, for duties associated
with this act. All monies accruing to the credit of such fund are
hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Department for the purpose of Ag in the Classroom Education Program.
Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the
State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment. The State Department of Agriculture shall
have exclusive control over the Ag in the Classroom Program and no
other state agency, board, commission, department, or other entity

Req. No. 12715 Page 3

of s tate government shall have authority with respect to any
expenditure from the revolving fund.
2. All monies received by the Department above Twenty-four
Dollars ($24.00) of the fee for the Agricultural Awareness license
plates shall be allocated toward the expansion of the Ag in the
Classroom Education Program into urban areas.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12715 JL 02/17/25















Req. No. 12715 Page 4